Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2264.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 12-16,132 is hereby amended to read as follows:
12-16,132. The administration, enactment or enforcement of any city
ordinance which that conflicts with K.S.A. 12-16,130 or 12-16,131, and
amendments thereto, is hereby declared to be void and against the public
policy of this state.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 19-26,114 is hereby amended to read as follows: 19-
26,114. The administration, enactment or enforcement of any county
resolution which that conflicts with K.S.A. 12-16,130 or 12-16,131, and
amendments thereto, is hereby declared to be void and against the public
policy of this state.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 12-16,132 and 19-26,114 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 4. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.